Georgia, session 2025_26, SB358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act revising, superseding, and consolidating the laws relating to the governing authority
of DeKalb County and creating a chairman and board of commissioners of said county,
approved March 8, 1956 (Ga. L. 1956, p. 3237), as amended, particularly by an Act approved
April 9, 1981 (Ga. L. 1981, p. 4304), an Act approved March 20, 1990 (Ga. L. 1990,
p. 3900), an Act approved April 13, 1992 (Ga. L. 1992, p. 6137), an Act approved
S. B. 358
- 1 -

LC 47 3571
May 12, 2015 (Ga. L. 2015, p. 3811), and an Act approved July 29, 2020 (Ga. L. 2020,
p. 4069), is amended by revising subparagraph (f)(1)(B) of Section 22A as follows:
"(B) A sworn written complaint may be filed with the ethics administrator of the Board
of Ethics, as described in this paragraph. All written complaints to be considered by
the Board of Ethics and the ethics administrator shall contain the following, if
applicable:
(i) The name and address of the person or persons filing the complaint;
(ii) The signature of the complainant which shall be validated by the ethics officer;
(iii) The name and address of the party or parties against whom the complaint is filed
and, if such party is a candidate, the office being sought;
(iv) A clear and concise statement of acts upon which the complaint is based along
with an allegation that such facts constitute one or more violations of law under the
jurisdiction of the Board of Ethics;
(v) A general reference to the allegedly violated statutory provision(s) of the code of
ethics within the jurisdiction of the Board of Ethics; and
(vi) Any further information which might support the allegations in the complaint
including, but not limited to, the following:
(I) The names and addresses of all other persons who have firsthand knowledge of
the facts alleged in the complaint; and
(II) Any documentary evidence that supports the facts alleged in the complaint;"
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising paragraph (3) of subsection (j) of Section 22A as
follows:
"(3) A complaint may be filed by any resident or group of residents of DeKalb County
by submitting to the office of the ethics administrator a written, and sworn complaint
under the penalty of perjury or false swearing. The complaint shall specifically identify
S. B. 358
- 2 -

LC 47 3571
all provisions of the DeKalb County code of ethics which the subject of the complaint is
alleged to have violated, set forth facts as would be admissible in evidence in a court
proceeding, and show affirmatively that the complainant or affiant (if in addition to or
different from the complainant) is competent to testify to the matter set forth therein. All
documents referenced in the complaint as well as supporting affidavits shall be attached
to the complaint;"
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 358
- 3 -